Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 4. Inspection Fees and Taxes

Cross references. —

For definitions of terms used in this article, see §

11-20-101

.

§ 11-20-401.
Brand inspection fees generally.

Except as otherwise provided, each livestock inspector shall at the time of inspecting for brands and ownership collect inspection fees in an amount established by the livestock board but not less than:

One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) per head on all cattle including unbranded animals, and including the hide or carcass;

Twenty-five cents ($0.25) per head on all sheep, including any hide or carcass;

Nine dollars ($9.00) per head for the first ten (10) head of horses, asses or mules inspected, including any hide or carcass and one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) for each additional horse, hide or carcass inspected at the same time and place; and

A six dollar and twenty-five cent ($6.25) surcharge per inspection by the livestock inspector. The livestock board shall promulgate rules and regulations to identify conditions under which this surcharge may be waived.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The board may allow the inspection, permitting, payment and reporting requirements of this chapter to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

, and any applicable federal electronic requirements.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 18; 1953, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-350; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 9; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; ch. 98, § 3; 1971, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 85, § 1; 1976, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-23-203

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 1; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2007, ch. 105, § 1; 2010, ch. 61, § 1; ch. 69, § 204; 2013 ch. 13, § 1, effective February 12, 2013.

The 2006 amendment,

added the proviso at the end of (a)(iv); and added (b).

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “less than” for “to exceed” at the end of the introductory paragraph; in (a)(i) substituted “One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25)” for “One dollar ($1.00)”; in (a)(ii) substituted “Twenty-five cents ($0.25)” for “Twenty cents ($0.20)”, inserted “, goats, llamas and alpacas” preceding “including any hide” and deleted “, except unbranded and undocked lambs running with their mothers; and”; in (a)(iii) substituted “Nine dollars ($9.00)” for “Seven dollars ($7.00)”, inserted “, asses or mules” preceding “inspected, including any”, substituted “one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25)” for “one dollar ($1.00)”; in (a)(iv) “A six dollar and twenty-five cent ($6.25)” for “Five dollar ($5.00)” and rewrote the second sentence.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch 61, § 1, substituted “all sheep, including” for “all sheep, goats, llamas and alpacas, including” in (a)(ii).

The second 2010 amendment, by ch 69, § 204, effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (b), which read: “Inspections under this section may be charged a surcharge pursuant to W.S. 11-20-405(c).”

Laws 2010, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2010.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 105, § 3, states as follows: “The brand recording and inspection fees specified in this act shall remain at the levels in effect on July 1, 2007, and shall not be adjusted before December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, the board may adjust the fees specified in this act subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 11-20-408(b).”

§ 11-20-402.
Miscellaneous
inspection fees.

Except as otherwise provided, the board shall establish and, through its authorized inspectors, shall collect fees for the following of not less than:

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 105, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 25, § 2.

One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) for each certificate issued to a hide buyer as required by W.S.

11-23-204

;

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 25, § 2.

Fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each permanent brand inspection and movement permit issued pursuant to W.S.

11-20-224

;

Twelve dollars ($12.00) for the first ten (10) head of livestock inspected and one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each additional head inspected under the annual brand inspection and movement permit issued pursuant to W.S.

11-20-225

;

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 87, § 3.

For an accustomed range permit under W.S.

11-20-223

, an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the inspection fees as established by the board pursuant to W.S. 11-20-401(a)(i) through (iii);

A six dollar and twenty-five cent ($6.25) surcharge per inspection by the livestock inspector. The livestock board shall promulgate rules and regulations to identify conditions under which this surcharge may be waived;

The fee for an accustomed range permit under W.S.

11-20-212

, of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00);

Actual hourly cost plus mileage for any nonmandatory inspections requested by a livestock owner. The hourly cost shall be as determined by the board and the mileage cost shall be as provided by W.S.

9-3-103

.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The board may establish and, through its authorized inspectors, collect fees from the livestock owner or other responsible party not to exceed the actual cost of any additional necessary reimbursable expenses including transportation, supplies or equipment rental relating to services required by the board. “Reimbursable expenses” for the purposes of this subsection shall mean expenses necessary to provide for the immediate safety of the public and livestock for which the board has authority. This subsection shall not apply to those services authorized under W.S.

11-20-401

.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 134, § 3; 1929, ch. 39, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 67-618, 67-1703; Laws 1937, ch. 47, § 12; C.S. 1945, §§ 56-912, 56-1101, 56-1203; Laws 1949, ch. 59, § 18; ch. 139, § 4; 1951, ch. 116, § 3; 1953, ch. 49, § 3; ch. 70, § 1; 1957, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-350, 11-378, 11-415, 11-421, 11-438, 11-446; Laws 1961, ch. 46, §§ 9, 31, 35, 40, 45; 1971, ch. 41, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1976, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

11-23-203

, 11-23-243; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 1995, ch. 152, § 1; 1996, ch. 25, § 2; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2007, ch. 105, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 3, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), added the proviso at the end of (ix). added (xi); and added (b).

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) inserted “fees for” following “inspectors, shall collect” and substituted “of not less than” for “fees for services rendered but not to exceed”; in (a)(iii), substituted “One dollar twenty-five cents ($1.25)” for “One dollars ($1.00)”; in (a)(v), substituted “Fifteen dollars ($15.00)” for “Twelve dollars ($12.00)”; in (a)(vi) substituted “Twelve dollars” for “Seven dollars ($7.00) per hour,” inserted “of livestock” preceding “inspected and,”
substituted “one dollar and fifty cent ($1.50)” for “one dollars ($1.00)” and deleted “horse” preceding “brand inspection”; rewrote (a)(viii); rewrote (a)(ix); in (x) substituted “The fee for” for “For”, deleted “a fee” following “W.S.

11-20-212

,” substituted “not less than fifty dollars” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” and repealed former (a)(i), which read: “For health inspection of livestock offered for sale through a livestock market the inspection fee shall be fixed by rules of the board.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (c).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (b), which read: “Inspections under this section may be charged a surcharge pursuant to W.S. 11-20-405(c).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 105, § 3, states as follows: “The brand recording and inspection fees specified in this act shall remain at the levels in effect on July 1, 2007, and shall not be adjusted before December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, the board may adjust the fees specified in this act subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 11-20-408(b).”

§ 11-20-403.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990,
ch. 87, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to brand inspection fees generally, see §

11-20-401

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1943, ch. 23, §§ 1 and 2, related to a special annual tax levied on livestock.

§ 11-20-404.
Report
of receipts and expenses.

The board shall on or before the first Monday in August each year present a written report to the director of the state department of audit, which shall contain:

A statement of funds received from inspection fees and other fees collected under W.S.

11-20-201

through

11-20-230

,

11-20-401

and

11-20-402

;

A statement of expenses of inspection, including salaries and expenses of inspectors, and that part of the expense of the agency, if any, incurred in administering the brand inspection laws;

The amount by which inspection expenses have exceeded the revenues for the fiscal year ending June 30;

An estimate of future expenses for the forthcoming year, which will become due and payable prior to the receipt of the amounts provided for herein to pay them.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 87, § 3.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 25, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 56-709; W.S. 1957, § 11-390; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 27; 1965, ch. 43, § 1; ch. 151, § 1; 1976, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-308; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 61, § 2; 2006, ch. 39, § 2.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “August” for “June” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “11-20-230” for “11-20-229” in (a)(i).

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 11-20-405.
Collection
and disposition.

Any funds appropriated by the legislature and all fees collected pursuant to W.S.

11-20-101

through

11-20-124

,

11-20-201

through

11-20-230

,

11-20-401

and

11-20-402

shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the inspection account. Interest earned by the account shall be retained in the account. Monies within the account are subject to legislative review and appropriation for use and expenditure by the board. Itemized vouchers shall be submitted to the chief executive officer of the board for approval. Upon approval, a warrant for the payment of each voucher shall be issued by the state auditor for payment from the inspection account. The board shall expend monies from the account created by this section only for the purposes authorized by W.S.

11-20-201

through

11-20-230

and

11-20-101

through

11-20-124

and to pay for investigators of the Wyoming livestock board who are peace officers as defined in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(E).

After March 1, 2006, all costs of operating and administering the brand inspection and recording programs shall be paid from any funds appropriated by the legislature, any applicable grant funds and the fees collected and deposited into the account created by subsection (a) of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 25, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 56-711; W.S. 1957, § 11-391; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 28; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1976, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-309; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 87, § 2; 1994, ch. 96, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2009, ch. 129, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 204; 2020 ch. 91, § 1, effective March 13, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence in (a).

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), added “Any funds appropriated by the legislature and,” substituted “11-20-230” for “11-20-229” in two places; in (b), substituted “March 1, 2006” for “July 1, 1996” inserted “any funds appropriated by the legislature, any applicable grant funds and”; added (c) and made related changes.

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1022(a)(xi)(E)” from the beginning of the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (c), which read: “(c)
After April 1, 2006, the board may charge a surcharge fee of up to fifty percent (50%) applied equally on all fees collected pursuant to W.S. 11 20 101 through 11 20 124, 11 20 201 through 11 20 230, 11 20 401 and 11 20 402.
These fees shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the inspection account.
This subsection is repealed effective June 30, 2007.”

The 2020 amendment,

in (a) added “and to pay for investigators of the Wyoming livestock board who are peace officers as defined in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(E)” at the end and made a related change.

Laws 2020, ch. 91, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§§ 11-20-406 and 11-20-407.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 87, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to brand inspection fees generally, see §

11-20-401

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1943, ch. 25, §§ 3 and 5, related to a special annual tax levied on livestock and the annual assessment roll.

§ 11-20-408.
Examination
of agency records; report.

The director of the state department of audit or his designee shall examine the records and accounts of any agency appointed by the board to administer the brand inspection laws, and report to the governor in the same manner as for the examination of records and accounts of public officers.

The board shall adopt an annual fiscal year budget for the brand registration and inspection program. The budget shall include any deficit amount from the prior year and may include an operating reserve not to exceed one (1) year for that portion of the program to be funded by user fees. Based on the budget adopted under this subsection, the board shall set the user fees for all activities under the program at no less than the minimum fees provided for in this chapter. Each fee may be adjusted not more than one (1) time per fiscal year and by not more than twenty-five percent (25%) in any one (1) fiscal year. The board shall report annually by November 1 to the joint agriculture, state and public lands and water resources interim committee with respect to the budget adopted and fees set under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 135, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 67-707; C.S. 1945, § 56-707; W.S. 1957, § 11-394; W.S. 1977, § 11-23-312; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2007, ch. 105, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2017 ch. 121, 2017, ch. 121, § 1, effective October 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 121, § 1, effective October 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “Beginning November 1, 2008” at the beginning of the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective October 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “twenty-five percent (25%)” for “twenty percent (20%)” in the fourth sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 105, § 3, states as follows: “The brand recording and inspection fees specified in this act shall remain at the levels in effect on July 1, 2007, and shall not be adjusted before December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, the board may adjust the fees specified in this act subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 11-20-408(b).”

§ 11-20-409.
Issuance of certificate.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

11-20-401

(c), all fees required by W.S.

11-6-210

,

11-20-201

through

11-20-230

,

11-20-401

and

11-20-402

shall be due and payable upon the issuance of a certificate
of brand inspection or clearance. No fees required by W.S.

11-6-210

shall be collected on the same livestock more than once
in any twelve (12) month period.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 87, § 1; 1991, ch. 129, § 1; 1992, ch. 17, § 1; 2006, ch. 39, § 2; 2013 ch. 13, §
1., effective February 12, 2013.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “11-20-230” for “11-20-229.”

Laws 2006 ch. 39, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2013 amendment,

added “Except as otherwise provided in W.S. 11-20-401(c).”

Laws 2013, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 12, 2013.